hu: Flash-cella típusa: MLC (többszintű cella); PLC (ötszintű cella); QLC (négyszintű cella); SLC (egyszintű cella); TLC (háromszintű cella); Egyéb
nl: Type flashcel: MLC (multi-level cel); PLC (penta-level cel); QLC (quad-level cel); SLC (single-level cel); TLC (triple-level cel); Andere
it: Tipo di cella flash: MLC (cella multi-livello); PLC (cella penta-livello); QLC (cella quadri-livello); SLC (cella singolo livello); TLC (cella triplo livello); Altro
sv: Flashcelltyp: MLC (flernivåcell); PLC (pentanivåcell); QLC (fyrnivåcell); SLC (enkelnivåcell); TLC (trenivåcell); Övrigt
ja: フラッシュセルタイプ: MLC（マルチレベルセル）; PLC（ペンタレベルセル）; QLC（クアッドレベルセル）; SLC（シングルレベルセル）; TLC（トリプルレベルセル）; その他
nb: Flash-celletype: MLC (flernivåcelle); PLC (femnivåcelle); QLC (firenivåcelle); SLC (enkelnivåcelle); TLC (trenivåcelle); Annet
lt-LT: Flash ląstelės tipas: MLC (daugiapakopė ląstelė); PLC (penkiapakopė ląstelė); QLC (keturpakopė ląstelė); SLC (vienpakopė ląstelė); TLC (tripakopė ląstelė); Kita
ko: 플래시 셀 유형: MLC (멀티 레벨 셀); PLC (펜타 레벨 셀); QLC (쿼드 레벨 셀); SLC (싱글 레벨 셀); TLC (트리플 레벨 셀); 기타
pl: Typ komórki flash: MLC (komórka wielopoziomowa); PLC (komórka pięciopoziomowa); QLC (komórka czteropoziomowa); SLC (komórka jednopoziomowa); TLC (komórka trójpoziomowa); Inne
ro-RO: Tip de celulă flash: MLC (celulă multi-nivel); PLC (celulă penta-nivel); QLC (celulă cvadru-nivel); SLC (celulă single-nivel); TLC (celulă triplu-nivel); Altele
zh-TW: 快閃記憶體單元類型: MLC (多層式儲存單元); PLC (五層式儲存單元); QLC (四層式儲存單元); SLC (單層式儲存單元); TLC (三層式儲存單元); 其他
fi: Flash-solutyyppi: MLC (monitasoinen solu); PLC (viisitasoinen solu); QLC (nelitasoinen solu); SLC (yksitasoinen solu); TLC (kolmitasoinen solu); Muu
fr: Type de cellule flash: MLC (cellule multi-niveaux); PLC (cellule penta-niveaux); QLC (cellule quadruple-niveaux); SLC (cellule simple-niveau); TLC (cellule triple-niveaux); Autre
vi: Loại ô flash: Mlc (ô đa cấp); Plc (ô năm cấp); Qlc (ô bốn cấp); Slc (ô đơn cấp); Tlc (ô ba cấp); Khác
th: ประเภทเซลล์แฟลช: MLC (เซลล์หลายระดับ); PLC (เซลล์ห้าระดับ); QLC (เซลล์สี่ระดับ); SLC (เซลล์ระดับเดียว); TLC (เซลล์สามระดับ); อื่นๆ
tr: Flash hücre tipi: MLC (çok seviyeli hücre); PLC (beş seviyeli hücre); QLC (dört seviyeli hücre); SLC (tek seviyeli hücre); TLC (üç seviyeli hücre); Diğer
zh-CN: 闪存单元类型: MLC（多层单元）; PLC（五层单元）; QLC（四层单元）; SLC（单层单元）; TLC（三层单元）; 其他
bg-BG: Тип флаш клетка: MLC (многонивова клетка); PLC (петнивова клетка); QLC (четиринивова клетка); SLC (еднонивова клетка); TLC (тринивова клетка); Други
sk-SK: Typ flash pamäte: MLC (viacúrovňová bunka); PLC (päťúrovňová bunka); QLC (štvorúrovňová bunka); SLC (jednoúrovňová bunka); TLC (trojúrovňová bunka); Iné
hr-HR: Tip flash ćelije: MLC (više-razinska ćelija); PLC (penta-razinska ćelija); QLC (četvero-razinska ćelija); SLC (jedno-razinska ćelija); TLC (tro-razinska ćelija); Ostalo
es: Tipo de celda flash: MLC (celda de múltiples niveles); PLC (celda de cinco niveles); QLC (celda de cuatro niveles); SLC (celda de un solo nivel); TLC (celda de tres niveles); Otros
sl-SI: Tip flash celice: MLC (večnivojska celica); PLC (petnivojska celica); QLC (štirinivojska celica); SLC (enonivojska celica); TLC (trinivojska celica); Drugo
en: Flash cell type: MLC (multi-level cell); PLC (penta-level cell); QLC (quad-level cell); SLC (single-level cell); TLC (triple-level cell); Other
pt-PT: Tipo de célula flash: MLC (célula de múltiplos níveis); PLC (célula de cinco níveis); QLC (célula de quatro níveis); SLC (célula de nível único); TLC (célula de três níveis); Outro
de: Flash-Zellentyp: MLC (Multi-Level-Cell); PLC (Penta-Level-Cell); QLC (Quad-Level-Cell); SLC (Single-Level-Cell); TLC (Triple-Level-Cell); Sonstiges
ru: Тип флеш-ячейки: MLC (многоуровневая ячейка); PLC (пятиуровневая ячейка); QLC (четырехуровневая ячейка); SLC (одноуровневая ячейка); TLC (трехуровневая ячейка); Другой
da: Flash-celletype: MLC (multi-niveau celle); PLC (penta-niveau celle); QLC (quad-niveau celle); SLC (enkelt-niveau celle); TLC (triple-niveau celle); Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de célula flash: MLC (célula multinível); PLC (célula pentanível); QLC (célula quadrinível); SLC (célula de nível único); TLC (célula trinível); Outro
el: Τύπος κελιού flash: MLC (multi-level cell); PLC (penta-level cell); QLC (quad-level cell); SLC (single-level cell); TLC (triple-level cell); Άλλο
cs: Typ flash buňky: MLC (víceúrovňová buňka); PLC (pětiúrovňová buňka); QLC (čtyřúrovňová buňka); SLC (jednoúrovňová buňka); TLC (tříúrovňová buňka); Jiné